Alabama, session 2026rs, HB626.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
16 Section 1. Section 11-99-2, Section 11-99-4, as last
17 amended by Act 2026-104 of the 2026 Regular Session, and
18 Sections 11-99-5, and 11-99-6, Code of Alabama 1975, are
19 hereby amended to read as follows:
20 "§11-99-2
21 As used in this chapter, the following terms have the
22 following meanings:
23 (1) BLIGHTED OR ECONOMICALLY DISTRESSED AREA. Any of
24 the following:
25 a. Any area in which the structures, buildings, or
26 improvements, by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, age,
27 or obsolescence; inadequate provision for ventilation, light,
28 air, sanitation, or open spaces; high density of population
Page 1

air, sanitation, or open spaces; high density of population
HB626 Enrolled
29 and overcrowding; or the existence of conditions that endanger
30 life or property by fire and other causes; or any combination
31 of such factors, are conducive to ill health, transmission of
32 disease, infant mortality, juvenile delinquency, or crime and
33 are detrimental to the public health, safety, morals, or
34 welfare.
35 b. Any area that by reason of the presence of a
36 substantial number of substandard, slum, deteriorated, or
37 deteriorating structures; predominance of defective or
38 inadequate street layout; faulty lot layout in relation to
39 size, adequacy, accessibility, or usefulness; unsanitary or
40 unsafe conditions; deterioration of site or other
41 improvements; diversity of ownership; tax or special
42 assessment delinquencies exceeding the fair value of the land;
43 defective or unusual conditions of title; or the existence of
44 conditions that endanger life or property by fire and other
45 causes; or any combination of the foregoing, substantially
46 impairs or arrests the sound economic growth of an area,
47 hinders the provision of housing accommodations, or
48 constitutes an economic or social liability and is a detriment
49 to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare in its
50 present condition and use.
51 c. Any area that is predominantly open and which
52 because of obsolete platting, diversity of ownership,
53 deterioration of structures or of site improvements, or
54 otherwise, substantially impairs or arrests the sound economic
55 growth of an area.
56 d. Any area that the local governing body: (i)
Page 2

d. Any area that the local governing body: (i)
HB626 Enrolled
57 Determines is in need of redevelopment, rehabilitation, or
58 revitalization to provide for the economic growth and
59 development of the area,; or (ii) certifies is in need of
60 redevelopment or rehabilitation as a result of flood, fire,
61 hurricane, tornado, earthquake, storm, or other catastrophe
62 which the Governor of the state has certified the need for
63 disaster assistance under federal law.
64 e. Any area containing excessive vacant land on which
65 structures were previously located; on which are located
66 abandoned or vacant buildings or old buildings; where
67 excessive vacancies exist in existing buildings; which
68 contains substandard structures; or with respect to which
69 there exist delinquencies in payment of real property taxes.
70 (2) DEFERRED TAX RECIPIENT. Each taxing authority that
71 receives ad valorem taxes with respect to property located in
72 a proposed tax increment district.
73 (3) ENHANCED USE LEASE AREA. Any area of a military
74 installation which contains underutilized real or personal
75 property, or both, that is leased by a secretary of a military
76 department to a lessee pursuant to the authority provided in
77 Title 10 U.S.C. § 2667.
78 (4) LOCAL FINANCE OFFICER. The legally authorized
79 officer or agent responsible for receipt and disbursement of
80 the revenues of a taxing authority.
81 (5) LOCAL GOVERNING BODY. The governing body of a
82 county or municipality which proposes to create or has created
83 a tax increment district.
84 (6) MAJOR 21ST CENTURY MANUFACTURING ZONE. Any area
Page 3

(6) MAJOR 21ST CENTURY MANUFACTURING ZONE. Any area
HB626 Enrolled
85 aggregating not less than 250 contiguous acres of real
86 property determined by a local governing body to meet all of
87 the following criteria:
88 a. Is located, in whole or part, within its boundaries
89 or corporate limits.
90 b. Is suitable for the site of an automotive,
91 automotive-industry related, aviation, aviation-industry
92 related, ship building-industry related, medical,
93 pharmaceutical, semiconductor, computer, electronics, energy
94 conservation, cyber technology, or biomedical industry
95 manufacturing facility or facilities.
96 c. Is an area within which not less than one hundred
97 million dollars ($100,000,000) of capital expenditure in
98 connection with the establishment, expansion, construction,
99 equipping, development, rehabilitation, or redevelopment of
100 the facility or facilities is anticipated to be made based
101 upon representations and information provided by the
102 anticipated user or users of the facility or facilities and
103 other information as the local governing body shall have
104 available to it and deems appropriate.
105 (7) MUNICIPALITY. Any incorporated municipality in this
106 state.
107 (8) PROJECT. Undertakings and activities of a public
108 entity in a tax increment district for any one or more of the
109 following:
110 a. As determined by the local governing body, the
111 elimination and prevention of the development or spread of
112 blight in, or the redevelopment or revitalization of, a
Page 4

blight in, or the redevelopment or revitalization of, a
HB626 Enrolled
113 blighted or economically distressed area, including, but not
114 limited to, property acquisition, property clearance,
115 development, preservation, redevelopment, rehabilitation,
116 renovation, or conservation, or a combination or part thereof,
117 in accordance with a project plan.
118 b. The utilization of underutilized real or personal
119 property, or both, in an enhanced use lease area, including,
120 but not limited to, property acquisition, property clearance,
121 development, redevelopment, rehabilitation, or conservation,
122 or a combination or part thereof, in accordance with a project
123 plan.
124 c. The utilization of underutilized real property in an
125 area determined by a local governing body to be a Major 21st
126 Century Manufacturing Zone, including, but not limited to,
127 property acquisition; property clearance; development,
128 including, without limitation, public infrastructure
129 improvements and any other improvements for the construction
130 and equipping of automotive, automotive-industry related,
131 aviation, aviation-industry related, ship building-industry
132 related, medical, pharmaceutical, semiconductor, computer,
133 electronics, energy conservation, cyber technology, or
134 biomedical industry manufacturing facilities; or the
135 redevelopment, rehabilitation, or conservation, or a
136 combination or part thereof, in accordance with a project
137 plan.
138 (9) PROJECT COSTS. Any expenditures made or estimated
139 to be made or monetary obligations incurred or estimated to be
140 incurred by a public entity, which in the case of expenditures
Page 5

incurred by a public entity, which in the case of expenditures
HB626 Enrolled
141 for or within a Major 21st Century Manufacturing Zone may be
142 incurred directly by the public entity or by a private entity
143 with funds granted by, or otherwise made available from, a
144 public entity, which are listed in a project plan as costs of
145 public works or improvements or, in the case of improvements
146 within a Major 21st Century Manufacturing Zone, public works
147 or improvements or private improvements, within a tax
148 increment district, plus any costs incidental thereto,
149 diminished by any special assessments, received or reasonably
150 expected to be received by the public entity in connection
151 with the implementation of the project plan. Project costs
152 include, but are not limited to, all of the following:
153 a. Capital costs, including the costs of the
154 acquisition, installation, or construction of public works or
155 improvements, new buildings, facilities or improvements,
156 structures, and fixtures, the preservation and renovation of
157 properties of historic significance and facades of properties,
158 the demolition, alteration, remodeling, repair, or
159 reconstruction of existing buildings, structures, facilities,
160 and fixtures, the improvement, maintenance, repair,
161 renovation, and replacement of property pursuant to a project
162 plan, the acquisition of equipment, the acquisition, clearing,
163 and grading of land, environmental remediation of real
164 property, and the acquisition of interests in land.
165 b. Financing costs, including all interest paid to
166 holders of tax increment obligations during the period of
167 implementation of the project plan, the costs of any form of
168 credit enhancement, printing and trustee costs, and any
Page 6

credit enhancement, printing and trustee costs, and any
HB626 Enrolled
169 premium paid in excess of the principal amount thereof because
170 of the redemption of the obligations prior to maturity.
171 c. Real property assembly costs, meaning any deficit
172 resulting from the sale or lease as lessor by the public
173 entity of real or personal property within a tax increment
174 district for consideration which is less than its cost to the
175 public entity.
176 d. Professional service costs, including those costs
177 incurred for architectural, planning, engineering, fiscal,
178 underwriting, legal advice and services, and consulting and
179 management services.
180 e. Imputed administrative costs, including reasonable
181 charges for the time spent by officers and employees of the
182 public entity in connection with the implementation of a
183 project plan.
184 f. Relocation costs, including those relocation
185 payments made following condemnation under Chapter 1A of Title
186 18.
187 g. Organizational costs, including the costs of
188 conducting environmental impact and other studies and the
189 costs of informing the public with respect to the creation of
190 tax increment districts and the implementation of project
191 plans.
192 h. The amount of any contributions made in connection
193 with the implementation of the project plan that are within
194 limits prescribed by law.
195 i. Payments made, at the discretion of the local
196 governing body, which are to be necessary or convenient to the
Page 7

governing body, which are to be necessary or convenient to the
HB626 Enrolled
197 creation of tax increment districts or the implementation and
198 management of project plans.
199 j. For purposes of any tax increment district in which
200 not less than 50 percent, by area, of the real property within
201 the tax increment district is an enhanced use lease area, all
202 costs described in this subdivision which are expended by a
203 public entity or a developer within three years immediately
204 preceding the date of the creation of the tax increment
205 district.
206 k. For purposes of any tax increment district which
207 includes an area that a local governing body has determined to
208 be a Major 21st Century Manufacturing Zone, the costs incurred
209 by a public entity to acquire land or interests in land
210 forming all or part of such Major 21st Century Manufacturing
211 Zone prior to the date of creation of the tax increment
212 district; provided, prior to incurring such costs the local
213 governing body of such public entity has recited its intent to
214 reimburse such costs from ad valorem taxes collected within a
215 future tax increment district.
216 (10) PROJECT PLAN. The properly approved plan by the
217 public entity creating a tax increment district for the
218 development, redevelopment, or revitalization of a tax
219 increment district, including all properly approved amendments
220 thereto.
221 (11) PUBLIC ENTITY. Any municipality or county in the
222 state.
223 (12) TAX INCREMENT. That amount obtained by multiplying
224 the total revenue derived from ad valorem taxes levied by all
Page 8

the total revenue derived from ad valorem taxes levied by all
HB626 Enrolled
225 local taxing authorities on all taxable property within a tax
226 increment district in any tax year by a fraction having a
227 numerator equal to that tax year's market value of all taxable
228 property in the district minus the tax increment base and a
229 denominator equal to that tax year's equalized value of all
230 taxable property in the district. In any tax year, a tax
231 increment is positive if the tax increment base is less than
232 the aggregate value of taxable property as equalized by the
233 Department of Revenue; it is negative if the base exceeds that
234 value.
235 (13) TAX INCREMENT BASE. The aggregate value, as
236 equalized by the Department of Revenue, of all taxable
237 property located within a tax increment district on the date
238 the district is created, determined as provided in Section
239 11-99-5.
240 (14) TAX INCREMENT DISTRICT. A contiguous geographic
241 area within the boundaries of a public entity defined and
242 created by resolution of the local governing body.
243 (15) TAX INCREMENT FUND. A fund into which all tax
244 increments not retained by a taxing authority as provided by
245 Section 11-99-10(a) are paid, and from which money is
246 disbursed to satisfy claims of holders of tax increment
247 obligations issued for the tax increment district.
248 (16) TAX INCREMENT OBLIGATIONS. Bonds, warrants, notes,
249 or other evidences of indebtedness issued by a public entity
250 to fund all or any project costs.
251 (17) TAXABLE PROPERTY. All real and personal property
252 located in a tax increment district which is subject to ad
Page 9

located in a tax increment district which is subject to ad
HB626 Enrolled
253 valorem taxation on the date of adoption of the resolution
254 creating the tax increment district.
255 (18) TAXING AUTHORITY.
256 a. For tax increment districts in which not less than
257 50 percent, by area, of the real property within the tax
258 increment district is a blighted or economically distressed
259 area, the term means any municipality, county, or other taxing
260 authority that has the power to levy taxes on property within
261 the tax increment districts.
262 b. For tax increment districts in which not less than
263 50 percent, by area, of the real property within the tax
264 increment district is an enhanced use lease area, the term
265 means the state or any municipality, county, or other taxing
266 authority that has the power to levy taxes on property within
267 the tax increment district.
268 c. For tax increment districts in which not less than
269 50 percent, by area, of the real property within the tax
270 increment district is which include an area that a local
271 governing body has determined to be a Major 21st Century
272 Manufacturing Zone, the term means the state or any
273 municipality, county, or other taxing authority that has the
274 power to levy taxes on property within the tax increment
275 district."
276 "§11-99-4
277 (a) In order to exercise its powers under this chapter,
278 a public entity shall take the following steps:
279 (1) The local governing body shall hold a public
280 hearing at which all interested parties are afforded a
Page 10

hearing at which all interested parties are afforded a
HB626 Enrolled
281 reasonable opportunity to express their views on: (i) the
282 concept of tax increment financing; (ii) the proposed creation
283 of a tax increment district and its proposed boundaries; and
284 (iii) its benefits to the public entity. Notice of the hearing
285 shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in
286 either the county or in the city, as the case may be, in which
287 the proposed tax increment district is to be located with
288 notice to be published at least twice in the 15-day period
289 immediately preceding the date of the hearing. Prior to
290 publication, a copy of the notice shall be sent by first class
291 mail to the chief executive officer of each deferred tax
292 recipient.
293 (2)a. In addition to the notice required by subdivision
294 (1), and either before or after the public hearing, the local
295 governing body shall make a written submission to the
296 governing body of each deferred tax recipient. The submission
297 shall include a description of the proposed boundaries of the
298 tax increment district, the tentative plans for the
299 development, redevelopment, or revitalization of the tax
300 increment district, and an estimate of the general impact of
301 the proposed project plan on property values and tax revenues.
302 b. Not later than the 15th day after the date on which
303 the notice required by subdivision (1) is mailed, each
304 deferred tax recipient shall designate a representative
305 empowered to meet with the local governing body to discuss the
306 project plan and the tax increment financing and shall notify
307 the local governing body of its designation. Failure of any
308 deferred tax recipient to designate a representative within
Page 11

deferred tax recipient to designate a representative within
HB626 Enrolled
309 the 15-day period, or to notify the local governing body of
310 its designation, shall not prevent the local governing body
311 from proceeding hereunder. If a deferred tax recipient who has
312 failed to so designate a representative thereafter designates
313 a representative and notifies the local governing body of the
314 designation, the representative shall be entitled to notice of
315 any meetings held thereafter pursuant to this section, and
316 shall be entitled to attend the meetings, but shall have no
317 right to have matters discussed again which have already been
318 discussed.
319 c. The local governing body shall call a meeting, or
320 meetings, of the representatives of the deferred tax
321 recipients to be held at any time after 20 days from the
322 mailing notice referred to in subdivision (1). Each
323 representative shall be notified of each meeting at least
324 three days before the meeting is to be held, but notice may be
325 waived. At the meetings, the local governing body and the
326 representatives of the deferred tax recipients may discuss the
327 boundaries of the tax increment district, development within
328 the tax increment district, the exclusion of particular
329 parcels of property from the district, and tax collection for
330 the district. On the motion of the local governing body any
331 other matter relevant to the proposed tax increment district
332 may be discussed.
333 (3) The local governing body shall adopt a resolution,
334 which need not be published, which does all of the following:
335 a. Describes the boundaries of the tax increment
336 district with sufficient definiteness to identify with
Page 12

district with sufficient definiteness to identify with
HB626 Enrolled
337 ordinary and reasonable certainty the territory included. The
338 description shall include only those whole units of property,
339 other than publicly owned property such as streets, easements,
340 and rights-of-way, assessed for general property tax purposes.
341 If the public entity is a county, the description shall
342 include only those areas that lie outside the corporate limits
343 of any municipality, unless the governing body of a
344 municipality has consented to the inclusion of land within its
345 corporate limits within a tax increment district formed by a
346 county.
347 b. Creates the tax increment district as of a given
348 date after the date of adoption of the resolution. The date of
349 creation of the tax increment district may be a date
350 subsequent to the date of expiration of the period of duration
351 of an existing tax increment district of the public entity.
352 c. Fixes the period for the duration of the tax
353 increment district.
354 1. The duration may be for a period not to exceed 30
355 years from the date of creation of the tax increment district
356 in the case of a tax increment district in which not less than
357 50 percent, by area, of the real property within the tax
358 increment district is a blighted or economically distressed
359 area.
360 2. The duration may be for a period not to exceed 35
361 years from the date of creation of the tax increment district
362 in the case of a district in which not less than 50 percent,
363 by area, of the real property within the tax increment
364 district is an enhanced use lease area or which includes an
Page 13

district is an enhanced use lease area or which includes an
HB626 Enrolled
365 area that a local governing body has determined to be a Major
366 21st Century Manufacturing Zone, unless an amendment is made
367 to the project plan under subdivision (7).
368 d. Assigns a name to the tax increment district for
369 identification purposes, such as "tax increment district
370 number one."
371 e. Contains findings, which shall not be subject to
372 judicial review except after a showing of fraud, corruption,
373 or undue influence, that:
374 1. (A) Not less than 50 percent, by area, of the real
375 property within the tax increment district is: (i) In need of
376 rehabilitation, redevelopment, revitalization, or conservation
377 work;, or (ii) an enhanced use lease area; or (iii)(B) the tax
378 increment district includes an area that a local governing
379 body has determined to be a Major 21st Century Manufacturing
380 Zone; and
381 2. The aggregate value of equalized taxable property in
382 the tax increment district plus all existing tax increment
383 districts created by the public entity does not exceed 10
384 percent of the total value of equalized taxable property
385 within the public entity or 50 percent if the public entity is
386 a Class 2 or Class 3 municipality. Provided, however, that
387 equalized taxable property located within the boundaries of a
388 military reservation, jurisdiction over which has been ceded
389 to the United States pursuant to Section 42-3-1, shall be
390 excluded from aggregated value.
391 (4)a. The local governmental body shall prepare and
392 adopt a project plan for each tax increment district. The plan
Page 14

adopt a project plan for each tax increment district. The plan
HB626 Enrolled
393 shall include all of the following:
394 1. A statement listing the proposed projects,
395 including, without limitation and if applicable, the kind,
396 number, and location of all proposed public works or
397 improvements or, in the case of a Major 21st Century
398 Manufacturing Zone, public works or improvements or private
399 improvements, within the district.
400 2. A detailed list of estimated project costs.
401 3. A description of the methods of financing all
402 estimated project costs and the time when related costs or
403 monetary obligations are to be incurred.
404 4. A map showing existing uses and condition of real
405 property in the district.
406 5. A map or description showing proposed improvements
407 and uses therein.
408 6. Proposed changes of zoning, master map plan,
409 building code, and other ordinances or resolutions affecting
410 the district.
411 7. A list of estimated nonproject costs.
412 8. A proposed plan for the relocation of any families,
413 individuals, and businesses to be temporarily or permanently
414 displaced from housing or commercial facilities in the
415 district by implementation of the plan.
416 b. For purposes of this chapter, any work or
417 improvement for a military installation and located within an
418 enhanced use lease area shall be deemed to be for public uses
419 and purposes.
420 (5) The local governing body shall certify all of the
Page 15

(5) The local governing body shall certify all of the
HB626 Enrolled
421 following before approving the project plant:
422 a. That a feasible method exists for the relocation and
423 compensation of any individuals, families, and businesses that
424 will be displaced by the project in decent, safe, and sanitary
425 accommodations within their means and without undue hardship
426 to such individuals, families, and businesses.
427 b. That the project plan conforms to the applicable
428 master plan of the local entity, if there is one.
429 c. That the project plan will afford maximum
430 opportunity, consistent with the sound needs of the public
431 entity as a whole, for the rehabilitation, redevelopment, or
432 revitalization of the tax increment district by private
433 enterprise.
434 (6) A copy of the project plan shall be mailed to the
435 governing body of each deferred tax recipient, before approval
436 of the project plan.
437 (7) The local governing body may at any time adopt an
438 amendment to a project plan by complying with the procedures
439 for the original adoption of a project plan.
440 (8) The public entity that created the tax increment
441 district, and each deferred tax recipient with respect to the
442 tax increment district, notwithstanding any provision in this
443 chapter to the contrary, by written mutual agreement duly
444 authorized, executed, and delivered thereby, may establish an
445 advisory board for the tax increment district composed of the
446 mayor or the chair of the county commission of the public
447 entity, as appropriate, a member of the governing body of the
448 public entity that represents the largest area in the tax
Page 16

public entity that represents the largest area in the tax
HB626 Enrolled
449 increment district, and other members as the respective
450 governing body, or its designee, of each deferred tax
451 recipient may appoint; provided a majority of the members of
452 an advisory board must be members of the governing body of the
453 public entity.
454 (b) Judicial review of a decision of a public entity
455 related to a tax increment district shall be as provided by
456 law."
457 "§11-99-5
458 (a) The tax increment base shall be determined as
459 provided in this section.
460 (b) Upon application in writing by the local finance
461 officer, the tax assessor, or the officer of the county
462 performing the duties of a tax assessor, for each county in
463 which any part of the district is located shall determine,
464 according to his or her best judgment from all sources
465 available to him or her, the full aggregate value of the
466 taxable property in the district located in that county as of
467 the date of creation of the tax increment district. The
468 aggregate valuation from all such tax assessors or other such
469 public officials, upon certification to the local finance
470 officer, shall constitute the tax increment base of the
471 district;, provided, however, if a public entity creates a
472 district that is to succeed and continue the programs and
473 project plans for redevelopment and revitalization of property
474 in an existing tax increment district upon its expiration, the
475 public entity and each deferred tax recipient with respect to
476 the successor tax increment district, notwithstanding any
Page 17

the successor tax increment district, notwithstanding any
HB626 Enrolled
477 provision in this chapter to the contrary, by written mutual
478 agreement duly authorized, executed, and delivered thereby,
479 may agree that the aggregate value of all taxable property
480 included in both the expiring district and the successor
481 district shall be the aggregate value of the taxable property
482 as originally determined for the tax increment base of the
483 expiring district as of the date of creation of the expiring
484 district and without redetermination of the value of the
485 taxable property as of the date of creation of the successor
486 district or some other date.
487 (c) If the public entity that created a tax increment
488 district in which not less than 50 percent, by area, of the
489 real property within the tax increment district is a blighted
490 or economically distressed area adopts an amendment to the
491 original project plan for the tax increment district that
492 includes additional project costs for which tax increments may
493 be received by the public entity, the tax increment base for
494 the district shall not be redetermined.
495 (d) If the public entity that created a tax increment
496 district in which not less than 50 percent, by area, of the
497 real property within the tax increment district is an enhanced
498 use lease area or which includes an area that a local
499 governing body has determined to be a Major 21st Century
500 Manufacturing Zone adopts an amendment to the original project
501 plan for the tax increment district that includes additional
502 project costs for which tax increments may be received by the
503 public entity or an expansion of the tax increment district,
504 the tax increment base for the district shall not be
Page 18

the tax increment base for the district shall not be
HB626 Enrolled
505 redetermined.
506 (e) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that any
507 property within a tax increment district, acquired or leased
508 as lessee by the public entity or any agency or
509 instrumentality thereof within one year immediately preceding
510 the date of the creation of the district, was so acquired or
511 leased in contemplation of the creation of the district. The
512 presumption may be rebutted by the public entity with proof
513 that the property was so leased or acquired primarily for a
514 purpose other than to reduce the tax increment base. If the
515 presumption is not rebutted, in determining the tax increment
516 base of the district, but for no other purpose, the taxable
517 status of the property shall be determined as though the lease
518 or acquisition had not occurred.
519 (f) The local tax assessor or person performing his or
520 her duties shall identify upon the tax records prepared by him
521 or her under Chapter 7 of Title 40 those parcels of property
522 which are within each existing tax increment district,
523 specifying the name of each district. A similar notation shall
524 also appear on the tax records made by the local finance
525 officer.
526 (g) The Department of Revenue shall annually give
527 notice to the designated finance officer of all taxing
528 authorities levying taxes on property within each district as
529 to both the assessed and equalized value of the property and
530 the assessed and equalized value of the tax increment base.
531 The notice shall state that the taxes collected in excess of
532 the base will be paid to the public entity."
Page 19

the base will be paid to the public entity."
HB626 Enrolled
533 "§11-99-6
534 (a) Positive tax increments of a tax increment district
535 shall be allocated and paid over to the public entity that
536 created the district for each year commencing on the October 1
537 following the date when the district is created until the
538 earlier of:
539 (1) That time, after: (i) The period of duration of the
540 tax increment district, as established pursuant to this
541 chapter, has expired,; and (ii) the completion of all projects
542 and public improvements specified in, or purposes of, the
543 project plan or amendments thereto, when the public entity has
544 received aggregate tax increments from the district in an
545 amount equal to the aggregate of all expenditures previously
546 made or monetary obligations previously incurred for project
547 costs for the district; or
548 (2) Thirty-five years after the last expenditure
549 identified in the project plan is made. No expenditure may be
550 provided for in the project plan to be made more than five
551 years after the district is created, except as may be provided
552 in an amendment to the project plan, and except in Class 3
553 municipalities where the expenditures may be made not more
554 than 10 years thereafter if so provided and in tax increment
555 districts in which not less than 50 percent, by area, of the
556 real property within the tax increment district is an enhanced
557 use lease area where the expenditures may be made not more
558 than 15 years thereafter if so provided, unless an amendment
559 is adopted by the local governing body under subdivision (7)
560 of Section 11-99-4(7).
Page 20

of Section 11-99-4(7).
HB626 Enrolled
561 (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every
562 officer charged by law to collect and pay over or retain local
563 general property taxes in the case of a tax increment district
564 in which not less than 50 percent, by area, of the real
565 property within the tax increment district is a blighted or
566 economically distressed area, or state and local general
567 property taxes in the case of a tax increment district in
568 which not less than 50 percent, by area, of the real property
569 within the tax increment district is an enhanced use lease
570 area or which includes an area that a local governing body has
571 determined to be a Major 21st Century Manufacturing Zone,
572 shall first, on the next settlement date provided by law, pay
573 over to the local finance officer out of all the taxes that
574 have been collected, that portion that represents a tax
575 increment allocable to a tax increment district, identifying
576 the amount for each district.
577 (c) All tax increments received for a tax increment
578 district, upon receipt by the local finance officer, shall be
579 deposited into the tax increment fund for that district. The
580 local finance officer may deposit additional monies into the
581 fund pursuant to an appropriation by the local governing body.
582 Monies shall be paid out of the fund only for direct payment
583 of, or to reimburse the public entity for payments theretofore
584 made by it for principal of or interest on tax increment
585 obligations for that district if the obligations are general
586 obligations of the public entity, or to satisfy claims of
587 holders of tax increment obligations issued for that district,
588 or for direct payment of, or to reimburse the public entity
Page 21

or for direct payment of, or to reimburse the public entity
HB626 Enrolled
589 for payments theretofore made by the public entity that are
590 used to pay project costs. Subject to any agreement with
591 security holders, monies in the fund may be temporarily
592 invested in the same manner as other surplus funds of the
593 public entity. After the principal of and interest on all tax
594 increment obligations of the district have been paid or
595 provided for, subject to any agreement with security holders,
596 if there remains in the fund any monies, they shall be paid
597 over to the chief finance officer of the state, each county,
598 each municipality, each school district, and to the general
599 fund of the public entity in amounts as are due to each
600 respectively, having due regard for what portion of these
601 monies, if any, represents tax increments not allocated to the
602 public entity and what portion thereof, if any, represents
603 voluntary deposits of the public entity into the fund."
604 Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 22

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB626 Enrolled
605
606
607
608
609
610
611
612
613
614
615 ________________________________________________
616 Speaker of the House of Representatives
617
618
619
620 ________________________________________________
621 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
622
623
624 House of Representatives
625
626 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
627 was passed by the House 31-Mar-26.
628
629 John Treadwell
630 Clerk
631
632
633
634
635
636 Senate 07-Apr-26 Passed
637
638
639
Page 23